Colorado, session 2026A, HB1413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-50-104, amend
(7)(a) as follows:
24-50-104. Job evaluation and compensation - state employee
reserve fund - created - study - report - definitions.
(7) Leaves.
(a) No employee shall earn more than ten days of sick leave per
fiscal year. No employee may retain accumulated sick leave in excess of
forty-five days at the end of any fiscal year; except that any employee who
had accumulated sick leave prior to July 1, 1988, shall retain such leave and
may accumulate a maximum of forty-five additional days. Any excess
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

accumulation may be converted to annual leave at the rate of five days of
sick leave to one day of annual leave up to a total of two days per fiscal
year. A medical certificate form from a health-care provider shall be
required for absences of more than three full consecutive working days, or
the use of sick leave shall be denied.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 28-3-601, amend (1)
as follows:
28-3-601. Public employees - annual military leave.
(1) Subject to the conditions prescribed in sections 28-3-601 to
28-3-607, any officer or employee of the state or of any political
subdivision, municipal corporation, or other public agency of the state who
is a member of the National Guard or any other component of the military
forces of the state organized or constituted under state or federal law or who
is a member of the reserve forces of the United States, organized or
constituted under federal law, is entitled to leave of absence from the
officer's or employee's public office or employment without loss of pay,
seniority, status, efficiency rating, vacation, sick leave, or other benefits for
the entire time the officer or employee is engaged with such organization
or component in training or active service ordered or authorized by proper
authority pursuant to law, whether for state or federal purposes, but not
exceeding the equivalent of three FOUR weeks of work on the officer's or
employee's regular work schedule in the leave year established by the
employer. The employer shall allow the leave if the required military
service is satisfactorily performed, which is presumed unless the contrary
is established.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1413

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1413